District of Columbia statutes.
32-531

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “broadcasting industry employment contract” means an employment contract executed, extended, or renewed after January 1, 2003 between a person, other than a sales representative, and a legal entity that owns or operates one or more television stations or networks, one or more radio stations or networks, one or more cable stations or networks, or one or more satellite-based services similar to a broadcast station or network, or any other entity that provides broadcasting services such as news, weather, traffic, sports, or entertainment programming.

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-258, § 2, 50 DCR 246

History